Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 70. General Provisions.

Sec. 09.70.010.
Applicability of title.

This title governs all proceedings in actions brought after January 1, 1963, and all further proceedings in actions then pending, except to the extent that, in the opinion of the court, their application in a particular action pending when the rules take effect would not be feasible or would work injustice, in which event, the laws in effect before January 1, 1963, apply.

History.

(§ 31.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.70.020.
Short title.

This title may be cited as the Code of Civil Procedure.

History.

(§ 31.01 ch. 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.70.030.
Good faith.

The parties to every contract have a duty to act fairly and in good faith in the performance and enforcement of the contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 2009)